Illinois, session 104th, HB643.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Section 11-101-4 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-101-4 new)7    Sec. 11-101-4. Joint-use airports; parking. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "joint-use airport" means an 9airport owned, in whole or in part, by a county, located in a 10county with a population of over 200,000 bordering the 11Mississippi River, and used by both military and civilian 12aircraft.13    (b) A municipality may not levy or collect any use, 14occupation, privilege, or excise tax, including, but not 15limited to, a parking excise tax, on any transaction that 16occurs on the premises of a joint-use airport or on property 17that exclusively serves a joint-use airport. This subsection 18(b) is a denial and limitation of powers and functions under 19subsection (g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 20Constitution.